src/foma/krl.foma
# 
def Alphabet [%'|a|b|c|č|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|š|z|ž|t|u|v|y|ä|ö];
def V [a|e|i|o|u|y|ä|ö];
def C [b|c|č|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|š|z|ž|t|v];

read lexc krl.lexc
def Lex;

def BackV [a|o|u];
def Markers %^ | W | G | "[PRT_SG]" | "[PRT_PL]";

def eInsertion [..] -> e || C _ "^" ?* G; # Vocal stem

def Partitive o  "[PRT_SG]" -> u o || C _  
          .o. "[PRT_SG]" -> t A
          .o. "[PRT_PL]" -> i "^" e  || C _ 
          .o. "[PRT_PL]" -> i "^" t A || V V  _
          .o. "[PRT_PL]" -> j A;

def kGradation l t -> l l || _ (V) "^" ?* W # Weak grades
          .o. š -> h || _ V "^"; # Weak grades

def jReplacement  i -> j || o _ %^ e;

def vGradation u -> 0 || _ V i %^ 
           .o. u o -> o i || _ [j|i] %^;

!def Harmony A -> a, O -> o, U -> u || \BackV+ ?* _ 
def Harmony A -> a, O -> o, U -> u || [a|o|u]+ ?* _ 
        .o. A -> ä, O -> ö, U -> y;

def Cleanup Markers -> 0;

def Grammar Lex .o. eInsertion .o. Partitive .o. kGradation .o. jReplacement .o. vGradation .o. Harmony .o. Cleanup;

regex Grammar;

 !save stack krl.bin
